Utah statutes.
30-1-17.3.   Age as basis of action to determine validity of marriage --
Refusal to grant annulment.
If an action to determine the validity of a marriage is commenced upon the
ground that one or both of the parties were prohibited from marriage because
of their age, in addition to all of the foregoing provisions, the following
shall apply: The provisions of this code regarding marriage by a person or
persons under the age of consent to the contrary notwithstanding, the court
may, in its discretion, refuse to grant an annulment if it finds that it is in
the best interest of the parties or their children, to refuse the annulment.
The refusal shall make the marriage valid and subsisting for all purposes.
